District of Columbia statutes.
47-4107

Attempt to interfere with administration of District of Columbia revenue laws.

(a)

A person who attempts to influence, intimidate, or impede an officer or employee of the District of Columbia acting in an official capacity under this title, or under regulations made under authority thereof, or in any other way corruptly or by force or threats of force (including a threatening letter or communication) obstructs or impedes, or attempts to obstruct or impede, the due administration of this title, regardless of the existence of an investigation brought under this title, shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01], or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both, together with costs of prosecution.

(b)

A person who forcibly rescues or causes to be rescued any property, or attempts to do so, after it has been seized under this title, or under regulations made under authority thereof, shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01], or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both, together with costs of prosecution.

(c)

All prosecutions under this section shall be brought in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia on information by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia in the name of the District.

Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-204, § 2(b), 47 DCR 5799
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(n)(7), 52 DCR 2638
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(gg), 60 DCR 2064
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $5,000” in (a) and (b).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 286(gg) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.